Tennessee, session 114, HB2173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-10-106, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d) The owner or person in legal possession must request a hearing in writing or
electronically within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice to show cause to the board why
the drugs or devices are not subject to this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2173
012219
- 1 -